Hawaii statutes.
[§480F-1] Definitions. As used in this
chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:

"Check" means any check, draft, money
order, or other instrument for the transmission or payment of money.
"Check" does not include a traveler's check or foreign denomination
or foreign drawn payment instrument.

"Check casher" means a person or
entity that engages in the business of cashing checks for a fee.

"Deferred deposit" means a
transaction in which a check casher refrains from depositing a personal check
written by a customer until a date after the transaction date, pursuant to a
written agreement.

"Fee" includes any payment of cash or
other consideration paid or given by a customer to a check casher in exchange
for the cashing of a check, including an exchange of value for the purchase of
catalog items, which is in excess of regular retail value, or for coupons,
which may be redeemed for goods or services. [L 1999, c 146, pt of §1; am L
2001, c 20, §1]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next